Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4050.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall study processes by
which other states of the United States and provinces of Canada attempt to align state or
provincial distributions of educational funding to local educational providers with the educa-
tional costs of the local educational providers.
(2) The director shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to education no later than November 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 212